apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="p/otere__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>otremmo</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otrei</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otreste</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otresti</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otrebber</l>  <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otrebbero</l> <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otrebbe</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otremo</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otrò</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otrete</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otrai</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otran</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otranno</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otrà</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otendo</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otendo</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otei</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otetti</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otesti</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oté</l>       <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otette</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otemmo</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oteste</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oterono</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oteron</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otettero</l>  <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossiamo</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossiamo</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantiamo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otete</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otete</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uoi</l>       <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uoi</l>       <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ossan</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossano</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossa</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oter</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otere</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oter</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otevamo</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otevo</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otevate</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otevi</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otevan</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otevano</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oteva</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otessimo</l>  <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otessi</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oteste</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otessi</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otesser</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otessero</l>  <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otesse</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otute</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otuta</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otuti</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otuto</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossiamo</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osso</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otete</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uoi</l>       <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>osson</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossono</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uò</l>        <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossiamo</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossa</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossiate</l>   <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossa</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ossan</l>     <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossano</l>    <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ossa</l>      <r>otere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="potere">          <i>p</i><par n="p/otere__vbmod"/></e>
